Tennessee statutes. Title 57 Intoxicating Liquors
Part 1

General Provisions

57-4-101. Premises on which certain sales and consumption authorized.

It is lawful to sell wine and other alcoholic beverages as defined in § 57-4-102, and beer as defined in § 57-6-102, to be consumed on the premises of, or within the boundaries of, any:

Hotel, commercial passenger boat company, paddlewheel steamboat company, restaurant, commercial airlines, or passenger trains meeting the requirements hereinafter set out, within the boundaries of the political subdivisions, wherein such is authorized under § 57-4-103;

Premier type tourist resort or club as defined in § 57-4-102, to guests of such resort and to members and guests of such clubs, subject to the further provisions of this chapter other than § 57-4-103;

Convention center as defined in § 57-4-102, to those in attendance at the convention center, subject to the further provisions of this chapter other than §§ 57-3-210(b)(1) and 57-4-103;

Historic performing arts center as defined in 57-4-102, to those in attendance at the performing arts center, subject to the further provisions of this chapter other than § 57-4-103;

Historic interpretive center as defined in § 57-4-102, to those in attendance at such interpretive center, subject to the further provisions of this chapter other than §§ 57-4-103 and 57-3-210(b)(1);

Community theater as defined in § 57-4-102, to those in attendance at such community theater, subject to the further provisions of this chapter other than § 57-4-103;

Historic mansion house site as defined in § 57-4-102, subject to the further provisions of this chapter other than § 57-4-103;

Terminal building of a commercial air carrier airport as defined in § 57-4-102, subject both to the further provisions of this chapter other than § 57-4-103, and to the approval of a majority of the governing board of such commercial air carrier airport;

Zoological institution as defined in § 57-4-102, to those in attendance at the zoological institution, subject to the further provisions of this chapter other than § 57-4-103. No such wine, alcoholic beverages or beer shall be served during the regular operating hours where the institution is open to the general public unless a special event is scheduled for fund-raising purposes which is by invitation or for which an admission is charged for such event;

Notwithstanding subdivision (a)(9)(A), zoological institution as defined in § 57-4-102(41)(A), (B), and (D), to those in attendance at the zoological institution, subject to the further provisions of this chapter other than § 57-4-103;

Museum as defined in § 57-4-102, to those in attendance at the museum, subject to the further provisions of this chapter other than § 57-4-103. No alcoholic beverage or beer shall be served during the regular operating hours when the museum is open to the general public except at a restaurant located on the premises of such museum or at a special event scheduled for fund-raising purposes when such event is either by invitation or admission is charged;

Commercial airline travel club as defined in § 57-4-102, located within a terminal building of a commercial air carrier airport as defined in § 57-4-102, subject both to the further provisions of this chapter, other than § 57-4-103, and to the approval of a majority of the governing board of such commercial air carrier airport;

Public aquarium as defined in § 57-4-102, to those in attendance at the public aquarium subject to this chapter;

Aquarium exhibition facility as defined in § 57-4-102, to those in attendance at such facility subject to the provisions of this chapter. Such alcoholic beverages, wine and beer shall only be sold on such premises at special functions, wherein attendance is limited to invited guests or groups, the function is not open to the general public, and the area in which the function is held is not open to the general public during such function;

Caterer licensed under this chapter as well as at such other sites as the licensed caterer has given advanced notice to the commission. Such sites shall be considered to be within the licensed premises for the purposes of this chapter;

Sports authority facility as defined in § 57-4-102, to those in attendance at such sports authority facility, subject to the further provisions of this chapter. A sports authority facility as defined in § 57-4-102(34)(A) constitutes an urban park center for the purposes of the taxes provided in § 57-4-301;

Theater as defined in § 57-4-102, to those in attendance at such theater, subject to the further provisions of this chapter;

Retirement center as defined in § 57-4-102;

Tennessee River resort district as defined in § 57-4-102, subject to the further provisions of this chapter other than § 57-4-103;

Civic arts center as defined in § 57-4-102, to those in attendance at the civic arts center, subject to the further provisions of this chapter other than § 57-4-103;

Limited service restaurant as defined in § 57-4-102, wherein such is authorized under § 57-4-103; and

Festival operator as defined in § 57-4-102, to those in attendance at a festival, subject to the further provisions of this chapter, and except as otherwise provided in § 57-4-102.

It is lawful to sell wine and other alcoholic beverages as defined in § 57-4-102, to be consumed on the premises of any:

Permanently constructed facility within an urban park center as defined in § 57-4-102, to those in attendance at the urban park center, subject to the further provisions of this chapter other than §§ 57-4-103 and 57-3-210(b)(1);

Any motor speedway as defined in § 57-4-102, to the patrons and guests of such motor speedway, subject to the further provisions of this chapter other than § 57-4-103. The phrase “premises of any motor speedway” includes any permanent or temporary structure erected on the motor speedway site as defined in § 57-4-102(23)(A); and

Country club located on an historic property, as defined in § 57-4-102, to the patrons and guests of such country club, subject to the further provisions of this chapter other than § 57-4-103.

It is lawful to sell wine, as defined in § 57-4-102, to be consumed on the premises of any:

Restaurant located within the boundaries of any political subdivision which has authorized the sale of alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises as provided in § 57-4-103, subject to the further provisions of this chapter. Notwithstanding the minimum seating requirement for a restaurant in § 57-4-102, a restaurant operating under this subsection (c) shall have a seating capacity of at least forty (40) people at tables, except in central business improvement districts located in counties having a population of eight hundred thousand (800,000) or more, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census where such restaurants shall have a seating capacity of at least twenty-four (24) people; and

Bed and breakfast establishment as defined in § 57-4-102, to the guests of the bed and breakfast establishment, subject to the further provisions of this chapter other than § 57-4-103.

It is lawful to serve wine and other alcoholic beverages as defined in § 57-3-101, and beer as defined in § 57-6-102, to be consumed on the premises of any club as defined in § 57-4-102(8)(G), to the guests of the club, subject to the further provisions of this chapter other than § 57-4-103; provided, that such club is located in a county having a population of not less than one hundred three thousand one hundred (103,100) nor more than one hundred three thousand four hundred (103,400), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census, and in a municipality which lies within two (2) contiguous counties.

It is lawful to serve wine as defined in § 57-3-101, and beer as defined in § 57-6-102, to be consumed on the premises of any restaurant as defined in § 57-4-102(30)(F), located in the unincorporated areas of any county having a population of not less than thirty thousand two hundred (30,200) nor more than thirty thousand four hundred seventy-five (30,475), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census, subject to the further provisions of this chapter other than § 57-4-103.

It is lawful to serve wine as defined in § 57-3-101, to be consumed on the premises of any historic inn as defined in § 57-4-102, to the patrons and guests of the historic inn, subject to the further provisions of this chapter other than § 57-4-103.

It is lawful for a charitable, nonprofit or political organization possessing a special occasion license pursuant to § 57-4-102 to serve or sell wine and other alcoholic beverages as defined in § 57-4-102, and beer as defined in § 57-6-102, to be consumed on the designated premises, or sold or donated in sealed containers for off-premises consumption within the boundaries of a political subdivision wherein the sale of alcoholic beverages at retail has been approved pursuant to § 57-3-106 or wherein the sale of alcoholic beverages for consumption has been approved pursuant to § 57-4-103. A special occasion license may also be issued for an event within the unincorporated portion of a county if at least one (1) municipality in such county has approved the sale of alcoholic beverages at retail pursuant to § 57-3-106 or the sale of alcoholic beverages for consumption pursuant to § 57-4-103.

Any hotel or motel licensed under this chapter may dispense sealed alcoholic beverages and beer to adult guests through locked, in-room units. Distilled spirits so dispensed shall be in bottles not exceeding fifty milliliters (50 ml.). No person under the age of twenty-one (21) shall be issued or supplied with a key by any hotel or motel for such units. Such units may only be located in any such hotel or motel if the voters of such municipality have approved the consumption of alcoholic beverages on the premises by referendum, and in any county in which such municipalities are located if the voters of such county have approved the consumption of alcoholic beverages on the premises by referendum.

A restaurant or hotel licensed under this chapter may seek an additional license permitting the restaurant or hotel to distribute and sell wine, beer and other alcoholic beverages at locations other than the licensed premises if the restaurant or hotel is providing catering services, if such location is within a jurisdiction where such sales are authorized. A caterer licensed under this chapter may distribute and sell wine, beer and other alcoholic beverages at locations other than the permanent catering hall if the caterer is providing catering services at a location that is within a jurisdiction where such sales are authorized.

It is lawful to serve wine as defined in § 57-4-102 within a special historic district as defined in § 57-4-102 on Fridays and Saturdays. Such establishments serving wine within the special historic district shall not be required to obtain a special occasion license pursuant to § 57-4-102 or be required to obtain server permits pursuant to chapter 3, part 7 of this title. This section shall not apply to any restaurant or bar located within the special historic district.

It is lawful to serve wine, as defined in § 57-3-101, to be consumed on the premises of any restaurant, as defined in § 57-4-102(30)(G), located in any county having a population of not less than sixty-nine thousand four hundred (69,400) nor more than sixty-nine thousand five hundred (69,500), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, subject to the further provisions of this chapter other than § 57-4-103.

It is lawful to serve wine as defined in § 57-3-101, to be consumed on the premises of any restaurant as defined in § 57-4-102(30)(I), located in any county having a population of not less than one hundred twenty-six thousand six hundred (126,600) nor more than one hundred twenty-six thousand seven hundred (126,700), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, subject to the further provisions of this chapter other than § 57-4-103.

A premier type tourist resort, as defined in § 57-4-102(27)(EEE), licensed pursuant to this part, shall be allowed to sell beer, as defined in § 57-5-101(b), to its patrons or guests, for either on-premises or off-premises consumption provided such premier type tourist resort, as defined in § 57-4-102(27)(EEE), obtains a permit, pursuant to chapter 5 of this title, issued by the county or city where such premier type tourist resort is located.

A licensee who qualifies for a restaurant license, limited service restaurant license, or hotel license may also serve alcoholic beverages in any area of the premises designated on the application that is used for the purpose of entertainment activities. Entertainment activities may include, but are not limited to, bowling, billiards, games, auditoriums, darts, or golf driving ranges. Any area used for entertainment activities shall have table service or be within close observation distance from the service area of the facility as determined by the commission.

It is lawful to furnish, dispense, or give away alcoholic beverages and beer without a license or permit issued by the commission at a private party or private event.

An entity licensed or applying for a license under subsection (a), or a manufacturer exercising the rights granted to it under § 57-3-202(i)(1), may include in the entity's designation of its premises any contiguous area owned or controlled by the entity for purposes of on-premises consumption of alcoholic beverages and beer. If the contiguous area used for on-premises consumption is unenclosed, the entity shall make reasonable efforts to ensure that a customer cannot leave the premises with an alcoholic beverage or beer purchased on the premises by using barriers to prevent the ingress and egress of customers to and from the premises. If more than one (1) entity licensed under subsection (a) or § 57-3-202 operates within the same building or facility, the designations of premises under this subsection (p) may overlap; provided, that each entity serves alcoholic beverages and beer in a glass or cup identifying the entity selling the alcoholic beverages or beer for on-premises consumption.

Acts 1939, ch. 49, § 3; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 6648.4 (Williams, § 6648.6); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-106; Acts 1967, ch. 211, § 1; 1972, ch. 682, § 1; 1972, ch. 756, §§ 1, 2; 1975, ch. 111, §§ 1, 2; 1979, ch. 401, § 1; T.C.A., § 57-152; Acts 1980, ch. 898, § 1; 1981, ch. 404, § 1; 1981, ch. 475, § 1; 1983, ch. 52, § 1; 1983, ch. 229, § 6; 1983, ch. 300, § 2; 1983, ch. 469, § 1; 1984, ch. 975, § 1; 1985, ch. 190, § 1; 1986, ch. 899, §§ 1, 2; 1987, ch. 444, §§ 1, 2; 1989, ch. 145, § 1; 1990, ch. 919, § 1; 1991, ch. 219, § 1; 1992, ch. 674, § 1; 1992, ch. 982, § 1; 1995, ch. 306, § 1; 1996, ch. 749, § 1; 1998, ch. 795, §§ 1, 5; 1998, ch. 939, § 1; 1999, ch. 314, § 3; 1999, ch. 525, § 1; 2000, ch. 657, § 1; 2001, ch. 64, § 1; 2001, ch. 74, § 2; 2001, ch. 84, § 2; 2001, ch. 371, § 1; 2001, ch. 383, §§ 1, 4; 2002, ch. 647, § 2; 2004, ch. 544, § 2; 2004, ch. 857, § 2; 2005, ch. 212, §§ 3, 4; 2005, ch. 253, § 1; 2006, ch. 602, § 1; 2008, ch. 634, § 1; 2010, ch. 647, § 2; 2010, ch. 927, § 1; 2010, ch. 1133, § 1; 2011, ch. 447, § 2; 2014, ch. 907, § 2; 2014, ch. 1001, § 11; 2015, ch. 336, § 1; 2015, ch. 367, § 1; 2015, ch. 391, § 4; 2016, ch. 874, § 2; 2017, ch. 142, § 2; 2017, ch. 147, §§ 7, 8; 2018, ch. 755, §§ 1, 3; 2019, ch. 300, § 1; 2019, ch. 435, § 4; 2020, ch. 778, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1989, ch. 145, § 3 provided that the alcoholic beverage commission is authorized to promulgate any rules which may be necessary to implement the provisions of this section.

For tables of population of Tennessee municipalities, and for U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Acts 2005, ch. 212, § 6 provided that:

“(a) The commissioner of revenue shall promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the provisions of this act.

“(b) The commissioner of economic and community development shall promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the provisions of this act.

“(c) The executive director of the alcoholic beverage commission shall promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the provisions of this act.

“(d) All such rules and regulation shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.”

Acts 2018, ch. 755, which amended this section, contained two act sections 4. One of which amended §57-4-102, and the other was the effective date provision.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment added (a)(21) and (p).

The 2019 amendment by ch. 300 added (a)(9)(B).

The 2019 amendment by ch. 435, in (p), inserted “, or a manufacturer exercising the rights granted to it under §57-3-202(i)(1),” in the first sentence, and inserted “or §57-3-202” in the second sentence.

The 2020 amendment substituted “§ 57-4- 102(41)(A), (B), and (D),” for “§57-4-102(41)(B) and (D),” in (a)(9)(B).

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 755, § 4. April 18, 2018.

Acts 2019, ch. 300, § 2. May 8, 2019.

Acts 2019, ch. 435, § 6. May 22, 2019.

Acts 2020, ch. 778, § 2. July 15, 2020.

Cross-References. Certain 1987 amendments to section inapplicable to certain counties, §57-4-104.

Hotels and motels, §57-5-107.

Nonresident seller's permittees prohibited from interest in business licensed under this section, §57-3-604.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Intoxicating Liquors, § 10.

Attorney General Opinions. Applicability of local beer permit ordinance to liquor-by-the-drink license holders, OAG 99-098 (4/30/99).

Because sales of liquor by the drink are legal in all of the various establishments and places listed in T.C.A. §57-4-101, so long as they obtain a proper license, a city may not, either by ordinance or referendum, limit sales of liquor by the drink to only some of the establishments and occasions listed in that section, OAG 02-092 (8/28/02).

Implementation of Tennessee River Resort District Act, OAG 05-161 (10/18/05).

A civic center could legally permit alcoholic beverages to be served during private engagements, so long as the service is provided by a restaurant, hotel or licensed caterer who complies with the requirements of T.C.A. §§ 57-4- 101(i) and 57-4-203(i)(3), OAG 06-175 (12/8/06).

Hours for the sale of beer in a municipality located within a Tennessee iver resort district. OAG 10-92, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 98 (8/17/10).

As a municipal corporation the city of Clarksville cannot obtain a license to sell liquor by the drink at any location or sell alcoholic beverages or beer to either private party lessees and guests or to the general public; no city employee or nonprofit corporation created or controlled by the city may obtain a permit to sell liquor by the drink or obtain a beer permit on behalf of the city. OAG 14-03, 2014 Tenn. AG LEXIS 5 (1/9/14).

Licensing and taxation of hotels selling alcohol for consumption on the premises. OAG 16-05, 2016 Tenn. AG LEXIS 3 (2/9/2016).